Utah statutes.
63G-4-403.   Judicial review -- Formal adjudicative proceedings.
(1)  As provided by statute, the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals has
jurisdiction to review all final agency action resulting from formal
adjudicative proceedings.
(2) (a)  To seek judicial review of final agency action resulting from formal
adjudicative proceedings, the petitioner shall file a petition for review of
agency action with the appropriate appellate court in the form required by the
appellate rules of the appropriate appellate court.
(b)  The appellate rules of the appropriate appellate court shall govern all
additional filings and proceedings in the appellate court.
(3)  The contents, transmittal, and filing of the agency's record for judicial
review of formal adjudicative proceedings are governed by the Utah Rules of
Appellate Procedure, except that:
(a)  all parties to the review proceedings may stipulate to shorten,
summarize, or organize the record;
(b)  the appellate court may tax the cost of preparing transcripts and copies
for the record:
(i)  against a party who unreasonably refuses to stipulate to shorten,
summarize, or organize the record; or
(ii)  according to any other provision of law.
(4)  The appellate court shall grant relief only if, on the basis of the
agency's record, it determines that a person seeking judicial review has been
substantially prejudiced by any of the following:
(a)  the agency action, or the statute or rule on which the agency action is
based, is unconstitutional on its face or as applied;
(b)  the agency has acted beyond the jurisdiction conferred by any statute;
(c)  the agency has not decided all of the issues requiring resolution;
(d)  the agency has erroneously interpreted or applied the law;
(e)  the agency has engaged in an unlawful procedure or decision-making
process, or has failed to follow prescribed procedure;
(f)  the persons taking the agency action were illegally constituted as a
decision-making body or were subject to disqualification;
(g)  the agency action is based upon a determination of fact, made or implied
by the agency, that is not supported by substantial evidence when viewed in
light of the whole record before the court;
(h)  the agency action is:
(i)  an abuse of the discretion delegated to the agency by statute;
(ii)  contrary to a rule of the agency;
(iii)  contrary to the agency's prior practice, unless the agency justifies
the inconsistency by giving facts and reasons that demonstrate a fair and
rational basis for the inconsistency; or
(iv)  otherwise arbitrary or capricious.
